Florida, session 2026, SB680.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âParagraph (ffff) is added to subsection (7) of 23 section 212.08, Florida Statutes, to read: 24 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 25 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 26 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 27 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 28 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 29 chapter. 30 (7)âMISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.âExemptions provided to any 31 entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is 32 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a 33 representative or employee of the entity by any means, 34 including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even 35 when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed 36 by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by 37 this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is 38 otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has 39 obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department 40 or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as 41 required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made 42 with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this 43 subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an 44 exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict 45 compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and 46 shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer 47 this subsection. 48 (ffff)âElectricity sold to an owner or operator of an 49 electric vehicle charging station.â 50 1.âElectricity, including electricity used for necessary 51 supporting equipment and infrastructure, is exempt from the tax 52 imposed by this chapter if the electricity is sold to an owner 53 or operator of an electric vehicle charging station and used for 54 the primary purpose of providing electric vehicle charging to a 55 consumer or any person pursuant to s. 366.94. 56 2.âThis exemption applies only if the electricity used for 57 the exempt purpose specified in subparagraph 1. is separately 58 metered at the point of delivery from the electric utility to 59 the owner or operator of the electric vehicle charging station. 60 If claiming an exemption pursuant to this paragraph, the owner 61 or operator of the electric vehicle charging station must 62 furnish the electric utility with an affidavit, on a form 63 adopted by department rule, attesting that the electricity is 64 used for the exempt purpose specified in subparagraph 1. If the 65 electricity is not separately metered at the point of delivery 66 from the electric utility to the owner or operator, it is 67 conclusively presumed that some portion of the electricity is 68 used for a nonexempt purpose, and all such electricity is 69 taxable. 70 3.âAny person that furnishes a false affidavit to the 71 electric utility for the purpose of evading payment of any tax 72 imposed under this chapter shall be subject to the penalties set 73 forth in s. 212.085 and as otherwise provided by law. 74 4.âPossession by an electric utility of an affidavit 75 furnished pursuant to this paragraph by an owner or operator of 76 an electric vehicle charging station relieves the electric 77 utility of the responsibility of collecting the tax on the sale 78 of the electricity from which the exemption is claimed, and the 79 department shall look solely to the owner or operator for 80 recovery of the tax if it determines that the owner or operator 81 was not entitled to the exemption. 82 5.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 83 a.ââElectric utilityâ has the same meaning as in s. 366.02. 84 b.ââElectric vehicle charging stationâ has the same meaning 85 as in s. 366.94(2). 86 c.ââNecessary supporting equipment and infrastructureâ 87 means equipment and infrastructure reasonably necessary for the 88 safe and efficient operation of an electric vehicle charging 89 station. The term does not include equipment or facilities 90 primarily used for commercial purposes unrelated to electric 91 vehicle charging. The term includes all of the following: 92 (I)âLighting and other public safety-related systems. 93 (II)âUser interface and payment systems. 94 (III)âAdvertising media and informational signage relating 95 to the electric vehicle charging station and located within the 96 immediate vicinity of the station. 97 (IV)âEquipment used for electric vehicle charging, 98 including conductors, connectors, attachment plugs, energy 99 storage and management systems, communication and control 100 systems, and personnel protection systems. 101 (V)âAll other fittings, electrical infrastructure, devices, 102 power outlets, or apparatuses installed specifically for the 103 purpose of transferring energy between the premiseâs wiring and 104 an electric vehicle. 105 6.âThe department must adopt rules governing the form for 106 the affidavit specified in subparagraph 2. 107 Section 2.âThe Department of Revenue is authorized, and all 108 conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules pursuant to 109 s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, to implement the amendments made 110 by this act to s. 212.08, Florida Statutes. 111 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.